Louisiana, session 2026, HB29.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:783.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§783.2. Ascension Parish; retired clerks and deputy clerks; creation of fund;
investment advisory board
A. There is hereby created the Ascension Parish Clerk of Court Retired
Employees Insurance Fund, hereinafter referred to as the "APCOCREIF", to fund the
payment by the clerk of Ascension Parish of the premium costs for eligible retired
clerks and retired deputy clerks as provided in R.S. 13:783.
B. The clerk of Ascension Parish may contribute to the APCOCREIF at his
discretion.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 29 ENROLLED
C. Upon recommendation of the investment advisory board established in
Subsection F of this Section, the clerk of Ascension Parish shall invest the monies
as follows:
(1) Not less than twenty-five percent in equities.
(2) At least twenty-five percent in fixed income investments into the
APCOCREIF, provided that a minimum of seventy-five percent of the fixed income
portion is rated as investment grade by a nationally recognized rating agency.
D.(1) The earnings realized on the monies invested pursuant to Subsection
C of this Section shall be available for the clerk to withdraw for the sole purpose of
paying the insurance premium costs provided in R.S. 13:783 for retired clerks and
retired deputy clerks of Ascension Parish, legal representation costs for the
APCOCREIF Board, or both, provided that no such earnings shall be withdrawn
until the amount of principal and accumulated earnings in the APCOCREIF are equal
to the sum of five million dollars.
(2) In the event that the total amount of monies derived from deposits
provided in Subsection B of this Section and investment earnings fall below the sum
of four million dollars, no earnings shall be withdrawn, and any balance owed for the
payment of insurance premium costs as required by R.S. 13:783 or legal
representation costs for the APCOCREIF Board shall be paid in full from the clerk's
general fund.
E. Any financial audit conducted of the clerk's office of Ascension Parish
shall specifically address compliance with the provisions of this Section.
F.(1) There is hereby established an investment advisory board to provide
recommendations concerning the investment of funds as provided in Subsection C
of this Section,
(2) The board shall be appointed by the clerk and consist of three members:
(a) The clerk or his designee.
(b) One retired clerk or retired deputy clerk.
(c) One active deputy clerk.
(3) The members of the board shall serve a term determined by the clerk.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 29 ENROLLED
(4) The members of the board shall elect a chairperson at its first board
meeting, which shall be held within thirty days after the appointment of board
members.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.